Illinois, session 104th, HB4514.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 8-306 and by adding Section 9-226.5 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/8-306)7    Sec. 8-306. Special provisions relating to water and sewer 8utilities.9    (a) No later than 120 days after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, the Commission 11shall prepare, make available to customers upon request, and 12post on its Internet web site information concerning the 13service obligations of water and sewer utilities and remedies 14that a customer may pursue for a violation of the customer's 15rights. The information shall specifically address the rights 16of a customer of a water or sewer utility in the following 17situations:18        (1) The customer's water meter is replaced.19        (2) The customer's bill increases by more than 50% 20    within one billing period.21        (3) The customer's water service is terminated.22        (4) The customer wishes to complain after receiving a 23    termination of service notice.  HB4514 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1        (5) The customer is unable to make payment on a 2    billing statement.3        (6) A rate is filed, including without limitation a 4    surcharge or annual reconciliation filing, that will 5    increase the amount billed to the customer.6        (7) The customer is billed for services provided prior 7    to the date covered by the billing statement.8        (8) The customer is due to receive a credit.9    Each billing statement issued by a water or sewer utility 10shall include an Internet web site address where the customer 11can view the information required under this subsection (a) 12and a telephone number that the customer may call to request a 13copy of the information. 14    (b) A water or sewer utility may discontinue service only 15after it has mailed or delivered by other means a written 16notice of discontinuance substantially in the form of Appendix 17A of 83 Ill. Adm. Code 280. The notice must include the 18Internet web site address where the customer can view the 19information required under subsection (a) and a telephone 20number that the customer may call to request a copy of the 21information. Any notice required to be delivered or mailed to 22a customer prior to discontinuance of service shall be 23delivered or mailed separately from any bill. Service shall 24not be discontinued until at least 5 days after delivery or 8 25days after the mailing of this notice. Service shall not be 26discontinued and shall be restored if discontinued for the   HB4514 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1reason which is the subject of a dispute or complaint during 2the pendency of informal or formal complaint procedures of the 3Illinois Commerce Commission under 83 Ill. Adm. Code 280.160 4or 280.170, where the customer has complied with those rules. 5Service shall not be discontinued and shall be restored if 6discontinued where a customer has established a deferred 7payment agreement pursuant to 83 Ill. Adm. Code 280.110 and 8has not defaulted on such agreement. Residential customers who 9are indebted to a utility for past due utility service shall 10have the opportunity to make arrangements with the utility to 11retire the debt by periodic payments, referred to as a 12deferred payment agreement, unless this customer has failed to 13make payment under such a plan during the past 12 months. The 14terms and conditions of a reasonable deferred payment 15agreement shall be determined by the utility after 16consideration of the following factors, based upon information 17available from current utility records or provided by the 18customer or applicant:19        (1) size of the past due account;20        (2) customer or applicant's ability to pay;21        (3) customer or applicant's payment history;22        (4) reason for the outstanding indebtedness; and23        (5) any other relevant factors relating to the 24    circumstances of the customer or applicant's service. 25A residential customer shall pay a maximum of one-fourth of 26the amount past due and owing at the time of entering into the   HB4514 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1deferred payment agreement, and the water or sewer utility 2shall allow a minimum of 2 months from the date of the 3agreement and a maximum of 12 months for payment to be made 4under a deferred payment agreement. Late payment charges may 5be assessed against the amount owing that is the subject of a 6deferred payment agreement.7    (c) A water or sewer utility shall provide notice as 8required by subsection (a) of Section 9-201 after the filing 9of each information sheet under a purchased water surcharge, 10purchased sewage treatment surcharge, or qualifying 11infrastructure plant surcharge. The utility also shall post 12notice of the filing in accordance with the requirements of 83 13Ill. Adm. Code 255. Unless filed as part of a general rate 14increase, notice of the filing of a purchased water surcharge 15rider, purchased sewage treatment surcharge rider, or 16qualifying infrastructure plant surcharge rider also shall be 17given in the manner required by this subsection (c) for the 18filing of information sheets.19    (d) Commission rules pertaining to formal and informal 20complaints against public utilities shall apply with full and 21equal force to water and sewer utilities and their customers, 22including provisions of 83 Ill. Adm. Code 280.170, and the 23Commission shall respond to each complaint by providing the 24consumer with a copy of the utility's response to the 25complaint and a copy of the Commission's review of the 26complaint and its findings. The Commission shall also provide   HB4514 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1the consumer with all available options for recourse.2    (e) Any refund shown on the billing statement of a 3customer of a water or sewer utility must be itemized and must 4state if the refund is an adjustment or credit.5    (f) Water service for building construction purposes. At 6the request of any municipality or township within the service 7area of a public utility that provides water service to 8customers within the municipality or township, a public 9utility must (1) require all water service used for building 10construction purposes to be measured by meter and subject to 11approved rates and charges for metered water service and (2) 12prohibit the unauthorized use of water taken from hydrants or 13service lines installed at construction sites.14    (g) Water meters.15        (1) Periodic testing. Unless otherwise approved by the 16    Commission, each service water meter shall be periodically 17    inspected and tested in accordance with the schedule 18    specified in 83 Ill. Adm. Code 600.340, or more frequently 19    as the results may warrant, to insure that the meter 20    accuracy is maintained within the limits set out in 83 21    Ill. Adm. Code 600.310.22        (2) Meter tests requested by customer.23            (A) Each utility furnishing metered water service 24        shall, without charge, test the accuracy of any meter 25        upon request by the customer served by such meter, 26        provided that the meter in question has not been   HB4514 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1        tested by the utility or by the Commission within 2 2        years previous to such request. The customer or his or 3        her representatives shall have the privilege of 4        witnessing the test at the option of the customer. A 5        written report, giving the results of the test, shall 6        be made to the customer.7            (B) When a meter that has been in service less than 8        2 years since its last test is found to be accurate 9        within the limits specified in 83 Ill. Adm. Code 10        600.310, the customer shall pay a fee to the utility 11        not to exceed the amounts specified in 83 Ill. Adm. 12        Code 600.350(b). Fees for testing meters not included 13        in this Section or so located that the cost will be out 14        of proportion to the fee specified will be determined 15        by the Commission upon receipt of a complete 16        description of the case.17        (3) Commission referee tests. Upon written application 18    to the Commission by any customer, a test will be made of 19    the customer's meter by a representative of the 20    Commission. For such a test, a fee as provided for in 21    subsection (g)(2) shall accompany the application. If the 22    meter is found to be registering more than 1.5% fast on the 23    average when tested as prescribed in 83 Ill. Adm. Code 24    600.310, the utility shall refund to the customer the 25    amount of the fee. The utility shall in no way disturb the 26    meter after a customer has made an application for a   HB4514 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1    referee test until authority to do so is given by the 2    Commission or the customer in writing.3    (h) Water and sewer utilities; low usage. Each public 4utility that provides water and sewer service must establish a 5unit sewer rate, subject to review by the Commission, that 6applies only to those customers who use less than 1,000 7gallons of water in any billing period.8    (i) Water and sewer utilities; separate meters. Each 9public utility that provides water and sewer service must 10offer separate rates for water and sewer service to any 11commercial or residential customer who uses separate meters to 12measure each of those services. In order for the separate rate 13to apply, a combination of meters must be used to measure the 14amount of water that reaches the sewer system and the amount of 15water that does not reach the sewer system.16    (j) Each water or sewer public utility must disclose on 17each billing statement any amount billed that is for service 18provided prior to the date covered by the billing statement. 19The disclosure must include the dates for which the prior 20service is being billed. Each billing statement that includes 21an amount billed for service provided prior to the date 22covered by the billing statement must disclose the dates for 23which that amount is billed and must include a copy of the 24document created under subsection (a) and a statement of 25current Commission rules concerning unbilled or misbilled 26service.  HB4514 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1    (k) When the customer is due a refund resulting from 2payment of an overcharge, the utility shall credit the 3customer in the amount of overpayment with interest from the 4date of overpayment by the customer. The rate for interest 5shall be at the appropriate rate determined by the Commission 6under 83 Ill. Adm. Code 280.70.7    (l) Water and sewer public utilities; subcontractors. The 8Commission shall adopt rules for water and sewer public 9utilities to provide notice to the customers of the proper 10kind of identification that a subcontractor must present to 11the customer, to prohibit a subcontractor from soliciting or 12receiving payment of any kind for any service provided by the 13water or sewer public utility or the subcontractor, and to 14establish sanctions for violations.15    (m) Water and sewer public utilities; unaccounted-for 16water. By December 31, 2006, each water public utility shall 17file tariffs with the Commission to establish the maximum 18percentage of unaccounted-for water that would be considered 19in the determination of any rates or surcharges. The rates or 20surcharges approved for a water public utility shall not 21include charges for unaccounted-for water in excess of this 22maximum percentage without well-documented support and 23justification for the Commission to consider in any request to 24recover charges in excess of the tariffed maximum percentage.25    (n) (Blank). Rate increases; public forums. When any 26public utility providing water or sewer service proposes a   HB4514 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1general rate increase, in addition to other notice 2requirements, the water or sewer public utility must notify 3its customers of their right to request a public forum. A 4customer or group of customers must make written request to 5the Commission for a public forum and must also provide 6written notification of the request to the customer's 7municipal or, for unincorporated areas, township government. 8The Commission, at its discretion, may schedule the public 9forum. If it is determined that public forums are required for 10multiple municipalities or townships, the Commission shall 11schedule these public forums, in locations within 12approximately 45 minutes drive time of the municipalities or 13townships for which the public forums have been scheduled. The 14public utility must provide advance notice of 30 days for each 15public forum to the governing bodies of those units of local 16government affected by the increase. The day of each public 17forum shall be selected so as to encourage the greatest public 18participation. Each public forum will begin at 7:00 p.m. 19Reports and comments made during or as a result of each public 20forum must be made available to the hearing officials and 21reviewed when drafting a recommended or tentative decision, 22finding or order pursuant to Section 10-111 of this Act.23(Source: P.A. 94-950, eff. 6-27-06.) 24    (220 ILCS 5/9-226.5 new)25    Sec. 9-226.5. General rate increases; public forums. When   HB4514 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1any public utility providing electric, gas, water, or sewer 2service proposes a general rate increase, in addition to other 3notice requirements, the public utility must notify its 4customers of their right to request a public forum. A customer 5or group of customers must make a written request to the 6Commission for the public forum. The Commission, at its 7discretion, shall schedule the public forum unless it is 8determined that the Commission does not have adequate staff or 9financial resources or that the public forum cannot be 10convened in a timely manner. The public utility must, to the 11best of the public utility's ability, provide advance notice 12of 30 days for each public forum to the governing bodies of any 13units of local government affected by the proposed general 14rate increase. The day and location of each public forum shall 15be selected so as to encourage the greatest public 16participation. Reports and comments made during or as a result 17of each public forum must be made available to the hearing 18officials and reviewed when drafting a recommended or 19tentative decision, finding, or order. Failure to comply with 20this Section shall not render invalid or otherwise affect the 21validity of any order entered by the Commission in a general 22rate proceeding.23    This Section does not apply to a public utility providing 24electric, gas, water, or sewer service to less than 15,000 25customers as of January 1, 2026. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on   HB4514 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17067 AAS 30482 b1January 1, 2027.